District of Columbia statutes.
1-328.04

Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development grant-making authority.

(a)

The Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development (“Deputy Mayor”) shall have grant-making authority for the purpose of providing:

(1)

Funds in support of the Skyland project;

(2)

Commercial revitalization services for properties adjacent to the Skyland project; and

(3)

Repealed;

(4)

Funds for the creation of affordable housing for District residents.

(b)

The Deputy Mayor may make grants for fiscal year 2013 as follows:

(1)

An amount of $100,000 for sector consultants;

(2)

An amount of $350,000 for local business promotion;

(3)

An amount of $75,000 for regional economic development;

(4)

An amount of $50,000 for the Bank on DC program;

(5)

An amount of up to $700,000 for the purpose of providing interior tenant improvement assistance to an entity that agrees to operate a table service restaurant at 3220 Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E., also commonly known as the Penn Branch Shopping Center; and

(6)

An amount of $800,000 for the purpose of providing assistance to a mixed- use development located in Ward 7, including 100% affordable housing units supporting former Lincoln Heights residents.

(b-1)

(1)

The Deputy Mayor may make grants for fiscal year 2014 as follows:

(A)

An amount of $100,000 for sector consultants;

(B)

An amount of $350,000 for local business promotion;

(C)

An amount of $75,000 for regional economic development; and

(D)

An amount of $50,000 for increasing access to financial services and products to unbanked and under-banked residents.

(2)

Grants made pursuant to this subsection shall be administered pursuant to the requirements set forth in part B of subchapter XII-A of this chapter [§ 1-328.11 et seq.].

(c)

In addition to the grant-making authority provided in subsection (a)(4) of this section, the Deputy Mayor shall have the authority to issue loans for the creation of affordable housing for District residents.

History

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 2032, 59 DCR 8025
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 2002(a), 60 DCR 12472

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 repealed (a)(3); and added (b-1).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Deputy Mayor Planning and Economic Development Limited Grant-Making Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-12, July 13, 2013, 60 DCR 7238, 20 DCSTAT 1759).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Deputy Mayor Planning and Economic Development Limited Grant-Making Authority Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-48, April 12, 2013, 60 DCR 5770, 20 DCSTAT 1354).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development Limited Grant-Making Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-132, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11529, 20 DCSTAT 1971).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2002(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2002(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 2001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title II of the act may be cited as the “Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development Limited Grant-Making Authority Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.